New Jersey, session 222, A5108.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this section: Municipal water utility means a municipal public utility, as that term is defined in N.J.S.40A:1-1, that provides water service. Residential customer means: a residential customer of record of a municipal water utility or a water public utility; or any residential tenant of a residence where the owner of the residence, and any other representative of the owner, as specified in the property record filed with the office of the county recording officer, is a non-residential customer of record of a municipal water utility or water public utility. Water public utility means a public utility, as that term is defined in R.S.48:2-13, that provides water service. b.    Within 30 days of a water meter failing to register, a municipal water utility or water public utility shall provide written notice clearly identifying the status of the faulty water meter through individual service or certified mail to: (1)   the owner of the residence; (2)   any representative of the owner of the residence, as specified in the property record filed with the office of the county recording officer; and (3)   each affected residential customer. c.     A municipal water utility or water public utility shall not place, sell, or enforce a lien on real property for the unpaid balance of water charges related to the period in which a water meter has failed to register unless written notice was provided pursuant to subsection a. of this section. d.    A municipal water utility or water public utility that violates the provisions of this section shall be liable to a civil penalty of not less than $2,500 per violation, which shall be collected by the New Jersey Board of Public Utilities in a summary proceeding before a court of competent jurisdiction pursuant to the provisions of the Penalty Enforcement Law of 1999, P.L.1999, c.274 (C.2A:58-10 et seq.). 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.